Utah statutes.
9-4-702.   Creation and administration.
(1) (a)  There is created an enterprise fund known as the Olene Walker Housing
Loan Fund, administered by the executive director or his designee.
(b)  The department shall be the administrator of the fund.
(2)  There shall be deposited into the fund:
(a)  grants, paybacks, bonuses, entitlements, and other moneys received by the
department from the federal government to preserve, rehabilitate, build,
restore, or renew housing or other activities authorized by the fund;
(b) transfers, grants, gifts, bequests, or any money made available from any
source to implement this part; and
(c)  moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislature.
(3)  The moneys in the fund shall be invested by the state treasurer according
to the procedures and requirements of Title 51, Chapter 7, except that all
interest or other earnings derived from the fund moneys shall be deposited in
the fund.
